Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3161.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-24 of the General Laws entitled "Zoning Ordinances" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-24-78. Student housing licensing.
(a) Definitions. When used in this section, the following words and phrases shall be given
the following meanings:
(1) “Student” means an individual enrolled as an undergraduate or graduate student at any
state college as defined in § 16-17.1-1 as well as any private university or college within the state.
who commutes to a campus.
(2) “Student housing” means a dwelling unit inhabited exclusively by students.
(b) Authority.
(1) A municipality may, through ordinance, require private real property owners to obtain
a license to operate a dwelling unit as student housing. An ordinance adopted pursuant to this
section may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Annual or periodic licensing or registration requirements;
(ii) Inspection requirements;
(iii) Enforcement procedures; and
(iv) Administrative appeal procedures.
(c) Applicability.
(1) This section shall apply to dwelling units located within the boundaries of the

municipality enacting the ordinance.
(2) This section shall not apply to:
(i) Dormitories, residence halls, or other housing owned, operated, or directly controlled
by an educational institution;
(ii) Dwelling units owned or leased by an educational institution; and
(iii) Dwelling units where rents are regulated under a federal, state, or local housing
program limiting rent levels including, but not limited to, public housing or units rented through
subsidies, vouchers or waiver programs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006211
========
LC006211 - Page 2 of 3